Washington statutes.
RCW 36.16.020

Term of county and precinct officers.

The term of office of all county and precinct officers shall be four years and until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW 29A.60.280: PROVIDED, That this section and RCW 36.16.010 shall not apply to county commissioners.

[ 2015 c 53 s 60; 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 26; 1963 c 4 s 36.16.020. Prior: 1959 c 216 s 2; 1919 c 175 s 1; 1886 p 101 s 2; Code 1881 s 3153; 1877 p 330 s 2; 1871 p 35 s 3; 1867 p 7 s 4; RRS s 4029.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1979 ex.s. c 126: See RCW 29A.60.280(1).